Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.152, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Report on budget reserve percentage. (a) The commissioner of management and budget shall develop and annually review a methodology for evaluating the adequacy of the budget reserve based on the volatility of Minnesota's general fund tax structure. The review must take into consideration relevant statistical and economic literature. After completing the review, the commissioner may revise the methodology if necessary. The commissioner must use the methodology to annually estimate the percentage of the current biennium's general fund nondedicated revenues recommended as a budget reserve. (b) By deleted text begin Septemberdeleted text end new text begin Octobernew text end 30 of each year, the commissioner shall report the percentage of the current biennium's general fund nondedicated revenue that is recommended as a budget reserve to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate Committee on Finance, the house of representatives Committee on Ways and Means, and the senate and house of representatives Committees on Taxes. The report must also specify: (1) whether the commissioner revised the recommendation as a result of significant changes in the mix of general fund taxes or the base of one or more general fund taxes; (2) whether the commissioner revised the recommendation as a result of a revision to the methodology; and (3) any additional appropriate information.